Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1301
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that (1) existing monitoring of ground water quality performed by natural resources districts is excellent and deserves recognition, (2) substantial efforts have been undertaken by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to monitor surface water quality, and (3) it is within the state's capacity to develop a comprehensive, integrated statewide water quality monitoring system.

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 266.